Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.010

Superintendent of public instruction authorized to receive and disburse federal funds.

The superintendent of public instruction is hereby authorized to receive and disburse federal funds made available by acts of congress for the assistance of private nonprofit organizations in providing food services to children and adults according to the provisions of 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1751 et seq., the national school lunch act as amended, and 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1771, et seq., the child nutrition act of 1966, as amended.

[ 1987 c 193 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.29.010.]